test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-41kand_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - kand: # Noun (41) kand 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     kand+N+Sg+Nom: kand
     kand+N+Sg+Gen: kanno
     kand+N+Sg+Par: kando
     kand+N+Sg+Ill: kando
     kand+N+Sg+Ine: [kannon, kannoh, kannohn]
     kand+N+Sg+Ela: kannost
     kand+N+Sg+All: kannolõ
     kand+N+Sg+Ade: kannol
     kand+N+Sg+Abl: kannolt
     kand+N+Sg+Tra: kannos
     kand+N+Sg+Ter: kannoniq
     kand+N+Sg+Abe: kannoldaq
     kand+N+Sg+Com: kannogaq
     kand+N+Pl+Nom: kannoq
     kand+N+Pl+Gen: [kandõ, kanda]
     kand+N+Pl+Par: [kandõ, kanda]
     kand+N+Pl+Ill: [kandõhe, kandõ, kandõdõ, kandahe, kanda, kandadõ]
     kand+N+Pl+Ine: [kannõn, kannõh, kannõhn, kannan, kannah, kannahn]
     kand+N+Pl+Ela: [kannõst, kannast]
     kand+N+Pl+All: [kannõlõ, kannalõ]
     kand+N+Pl+Ade: [kannõl, kannal]
     kand+N+Pl+Abl: [kannõlt, kannalt]
     kand+N+Pl+Tra: [kannõs, kannas]
     kand+N+Pl+Ter: [kannõniq, kannaniq]
     kand+N+Pl+Abe: [kannõldaq, kannaldaq]
     kand+N+Pl+Com: [kandõgaq, kandagaq]
